Montana, session 2025, HB601.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Medicaid community assister portal. (1) By May 1, 2026, the department shall establish
an online portal that allows a community assister to help an applicant or enrollee who seeks assistance from
that community assister to apply for medicaid coverage and to submit required documents.
(2) The online portal must allow a community assister to:
(a) review the status of a medicaid application or redetermination;
(b) view notices from the department to the applicant or enrollee;
(c) report a change in an applicant or enrollee's eligibility status;
(d) view actions required by the applicant or enrollee; and
(e) update the applicant or enrollee's contact information.
(3) The online portal may allow a community assister to:
(a) submit an application for initial coverage or redetermination on behalf of the applicant or
enrollee; or
(b) upload verification documents for the applicant or enrollee.
(4) The online portal must allow a medicaid applicant or enrollee to designate one or more
community assisters to help the applicant or enrollee with the activities prescribed under subsection (2) and
allowed under subsection (3).
(5) For the purposes of this section, "community assister" means a person or organization who
helps individuals apply for health coverage under the Montana medicaid program established in 53-6-101.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 601
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 601
Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
53, chapter 6, part 1, and the provisions of Title 53, chapter 6, part 1, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 601
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 601, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 601
INTRODUCED BY S. HOWELL, M. CAFERRO
AN ACT ESTABLISHING A MEDICAID COMMUNITY ASSISTER PORTAL; PROVIDING FOR REQUIRED AND
OPTIONAL PORTAL SERVICES; AND PROVIDING A DEFINITION.”